Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2427.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2102 of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 2102. Definitions.--As used in this article, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this section:* * *123456789101112131415161718192021222324 "Stage four, advanced metastatic cancer." Cancer that has spread from the primary or original site of the cancer to nearby tissues, lymph nodes or other areas of the body.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 2157.1. Utilization management for stage four, advanced metastatic cancer drugs.An insurer or health insurance policy that, directly or indirectly, covers the treatment of stage four, advanced metastatic cancer may not require a covered person to first fail to successfully respond to a different drug, or prove a history of failure in use of a different drug, before providing coverage for a covered drug to which both of the following apply:(1) The drug is approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for this indication.(2) The prescription of the drug is consistent with the best clinical practices for the treatment of stage four, advanced metastatic cancer or a severe adverse health condition experienced as a result of stage four, advanced metastatic cancer, and is supported by peer-reviewed medical literature.Section 3. Repeals are as follows:(1) The General Assembly declares that the repeal under paragraph (2) is necessary to effectuate the addition of section 2157.1 of the act.(2) The act of February 12, 2020 (P.L.11, No.6), known as the Fair Access to Cancer Treatment Law, is repealed.Section 4. The addition of section 2157.1 of the act is a continuation of the act of February 12, 2020 (P.L.11, No.6), known as the Fair Access to Cancer Treatment Law. The following 20260HB2427PN3233 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall apply:(1) Except as otherwise provided in section 2157.1 of the act, all activities initiated under the Fair Access to Cancer Treatment Law shall continue and remain in full force and effect and may be completed under section 2157.1 of the act. Orders, regulations, rules and decisions which were made under the Fair Access to Cancer Treatment Law, and which are in effect on the effective date of this section, shall remain in full force and effect until revoked, vacated or modified under section 2157.1 of the act. Contracts, obligations and collective bargaining agreements entered into under the Fair Access to Cancer Treatment Law are not affected nor impaired by the repeal of the Fair Access to Cancer Treatment Law.(2) Any difference in language between section 2157.1 of the act and the Fair Access to Cancer Treatment Law is intended only to conform to the style of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes and is not intended to change or affect the legislative intent, judicial construction or administration and implementation of the Fair Access to Cancer Treatment Law.Section 5. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2427PN3233 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021